Maryland, session 2025, SB0695.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
10–308.
(a) (1) The Board consists of [3] FIVE members, appointed by the Governor
with the advice and consent of the Senate.
(2) Of the [3] FIVE members of the Board:
(i) [1 shall represent labor] TWO SHALL HAVE SUBSTANTIAL
EXPERIENCE AS OFFICERS OR EMPLOYEES OF A PROPERTY AND CASUALTY
INSURANCE COMPANY;
(ii) [1 shall represent management; and] ONE SHALL HAVE
SUBSTANTIAL EXPERIENCE IN THE FIELD OF ACCOUNTING OR FINANCE;
(iii) [1 shall represent the general public] ONE SHALL BE A
POLICYHOLDER OF WORKERS’ COMPENSATION INSURANCE ISSUED IN THE STATE;
AND
(IV) ONE SHALL REPRESENT THE GENERAL PUBLIC.
– 1 –

Ch. 309 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) Before taking office, each appointee to the Board shall take the oath required
by Article I, § 9 of the Maryland Constitution.
(c) (1) The term of a member is 4 years.
(2) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(3) A member who is appointed after a term has begun serves only for the
rest of the term and until a successor is appointed and qualifies.
(d) The Governor may remove a member for incompetence or misconduct.
10–317.
The Board [may] SHALL establish reserves to meet potential losses of the Fund.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –